Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 1. General Administrative Provisions.
Sec. 47.05.070.
Third party liability subrogation.

The department may not pay medical claims that are payable by a third party payor. Medical providers shall attempt collection from the third party payor before billing Medicaid. Before payment by Medicaid, evidence of third-party denial or partial payment shall be presented with the claim.

When the department provides or pays for medical assistance for injury or illness under this title, the department is subrogated to not more than the part of an insurance payment or other recovery by the recipient that is for medical expenses provided by the department. Notwithstanding the assertion of any action or claim by the recipient of medical assistance, the department may bring an action in the superior court against an alleged third-party payor to recover an amount subrogated to the department for medical assistance provided on behalf of a recipient.

If a recipient of medical assistance under this title settles a claim or obtains an award or judgment arising from the injury or illness for which the medical assistance was received, the amount of the claim to which the department is entitled under (b) of this section shall be reduced by a pro rata share of the attorney fees and litigation costs. Regardless of the manner in which the amount of the attorney fees is derived in the particular case, the pro rata reduction of the subrogated claim for reimbursement of attorney fees shall be calculated in accordance with the applicable rules of court governing the award of attorney fees in civil matters.

The department is authorized to enter into contracts for the collection of medical expenses already paid by Medicaid from potential third-party payors. The department may pay, from the funds recovered by the contractor, any amounts owing to the federal government as its share of the Medicaid paid claim, and the costs of collecting the funds.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 96 SLA 2006.]

The department may adopt regulations to interpret and implement this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 105 SLA 1986; am §§ 6 — 8 ch 85 SLA 2000; am §§ 2, 9 ch 96 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

For applicability of the 2000 amendments of subsections (b) and (c), and the addition of subsections (e) and (f), see sec. 10(b), ch. 85, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary & Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For recovery of medicaid expenditures from recipients, see 7 AAC 43, art. 32.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2006 amendment, effective May 23, 2008, rewrote subsection (b) and repealed subsection (e).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 10, ch. 96, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 conditional amendment of (b) of this section applies “to a cause of action related to a subrogation, assignment, or lien by the Department of Health & Social Services that accrues on or after the effective date of [§ 2, ch. 96, SLA 2006].” Under § 4, ch. 39, SLA 2008, the effective date of § 2, ch. 96, SLA 2006 is May 23, 2008.

Sec. 47.05.071.
Duty of a medical assistance recipient.

A medical assistance recipient shall cooperate with and assist the department in identifying and providing information concerning third parties who may be liable to pay for care and services received by the recipient under the medical assistance program.

As a condition of medical assistance eligibility, a person who applies for medical assistance shall, at the time of application,

assign to the department the applicant’s rights of payment for care and services from any third party to the extent the department has paid medical assistance for care and services;

cooperate with and assist the department in identifying and providing information concerning third parties who may be liable to pay for care and services received by the recipient under the medical assistance program; and

agree to make application for all other available third-party resources that may be used to provide or pay for the cost of care or services received by the medical assistance recipient or that may be used to finance reimbursement to the state for the cost of care or services received by the medical assistance recipient; a medical assistance recipient is under no duty to file a civil or other action for the purpose of reimbursing the state for the cost of care or services.

History.

(§ 3 ch 96 SLA 2006)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 10, ch. 96, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 conditional enactment of this section applies “to a cause of action related to a subrogation, assignment, or lien by the Department of Health & Social Services that accrues on or after the effective date of [§ 3, ch. 96, SLA 2006].” Under § 4, ch. 39, SLA 2008, the effective date of § 3, ch. 96, SLA 2006 is May 23, 2008.

Sec. 47.05.072.
Duty of attorney for medical assistance recipient.

An attorney representing a medical assistance recipient shall notify the attorney general’s office.

The notice to the attorney general’s office required under (a) of this section includes submission of the following:

identification of the medical assistance recipient’s name, last known address, and telephone number, and the date of the injury or illness giving rise to the action or claim;

copies of the pleadings and other papers related to the action or claim;

the identification of each potentially liable third party, including that party’s name, last known address, and telephone number;

the identification of any insurance policy potentially responsive to the action or claim; and

a description of the facts and circumstances supporting the action or claim.

An attorney who represents a medical assistance recipient shall give the attorney general’s office notice within 30 days of any judgment, award, or settlement in an action or claim by the medical assistance recipient to recover damages for an injury or illness that has resulted in the department’s providing or paying for medical assistance.

If a medical assistance recipient is handling the action or claim on a pro se basis, the provisions of this section apply as if the medical assistance recipient were an attorney representing the medical assistance recipient.

History.

(§ 3 ch 96 SLA 2006)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 10, ch. 96, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 conditional enactment of this section applies “to a cause of action related to a subrogation, assignment, or lien by the Department of Health & Social Services that accrues on or after the effective date of [§ 3, ch. 96, SLA 2006].” Under § 4, ch. 39, SLA 2008, the effective date of § 3, ch. 96, SLA 2006 is May 23, 2008.

Sec. 47.05.073.
Judgment, award, or settlement of a medical assistance lien.

A medical assistance recipient may not maintain any rights to payment for medical costs as a result of a judgment, award, or settlement of an action or claim for which another person may be legally obligated to pay without first making repayment to the department for costs of past medical assistance services provided to or paid for on behalf of the medical assistance recipient that relate to that action or claim.

A medical assistance recipient may not place any payment as a result of a judgment, award, or settlement of an action or claim for which another person was legally obligated to pay because of injury or illness into any trust for the purpose of maintaining public assistance or medical assistance eligibility without first making repayment to the department for costs of past medical assistance services provided to the medical assistance recipient related to that action or claim.

The attorney general may only discharge a medical assistance lien under AS

47.05.075

if the discharge complies with federal law.

Notwithstanding (a) — (c) of this section, a third-party payor shall have no further liability if it settles or compromises a dispute in good faith and without knowledge that the individual is a recipient of medical assistance.

History.

(§ 3 ch 96 SLA 2006)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 10, ch. 96, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 conditional enactment of this section applies “to a cause of action related to a subrogation, assignment, or lien by the Department of Health & Social Services that accrues on or after the effective date of [§ 3, ch. 96, SLA 2006].” Under § 4, ch. 39, SLA 2008, the effective date of § 3, ch. 96, SLA 2006 is May 23, 2008.

Sec. 47.05.074.
Conflict with federal requirements.

If any provision of this chapter related to subrogation, assignment, or lien conflicts with federal law concerning the Medicaid program or receipt of federal money to finance the medical assistance program, the provision does not apply to the extent of the conflict.

History.

(§ 3 ch 96 SLA 2006)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 10, ch. 96, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 conditional enactment of this section applies “to a cause of action related to a subrogation, assignment, or lien by the Department of Health & Social Services that accrues on or after the effective date of [§ 3, ch. 96, SLA 2006].” Under § 4, ch. 39, SLA 2008, the effective date of § 3, ch. 96, SLA 2006 is May 23, 2008.

Sec. 47.05.075.
Medical assistance lien.

The department has a lien upon any sum that may be due to the recipient of medical assistance from a third-party payor. The lien is in the amount of the medical assistance paid for medical services under this title, together with reasonable attorney fees and litigation costs incurred in the enforcement of the lien.

A lien against a sum due from a third-party payor for medical services provided to a recipient of medical assistance under this title attaches and is effective upon filing with a recorder’s office in any recording district in the state. However, a lien filed under this subsection is not perfected and has no effect unless notice of filing of the lien is served by the department upon the third-party payor, personally or by registered, certified, or insured mail, return receipt requested.

If a recipient of medical assistance under this title settles a claim or obtains an award or judgment arising from the injury or illness for which the medical assistance was received, the amount of the lien to which the department is entitled under (a) of this section shall be reduced by a pro rata share of the attorney fees and litigation costs. Regardless of the manner in which the amount of the attorney fees is derived in the particular case, the pro rata reduction of the lien shall be calculated in accordance with the applicable rules of court governing the award of attorney fees in civil matters.

A perfected lien under this section has priority over all other liens except tax liens and a lien perfected for attorney fees and costs.

History.

(§ 9 ch 85 SLA 2000; am § 4 ch 96 SLA 2006)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2006 amendment, effective May 23, 2008, substituted “over all other liens except tax liens and a lien perfected for attorney fees and costs” for “immediately after a lien perfected by a hospital, nurse, or physician under AS

34.35.450

—

34.35.480

” in subsection (d).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 10, ch. 96, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 conditional amendment of (d) of this section applies “to a cause of action related to a subrogation, assignment, or lien by the Department of Health & Social Services that accrues on or after the effective date of [§ 4, ch. 96, SLA 2006].” Under § 4, ch. 39, SLA 2008, the effective date of § 4, ch. 96, SLA 2006 is May 23, 2008.

Sec. 47.05.080.
Recovery of overpayments.

Except for overpayments recovered under AS 47.07 that cover the value of services paid from federal sources, benefit overpayments collected by the department in administering public assistance programs under AS

47.05.010

shall be remitted to the Department of Revenue under AS

37.10.050(a)

.

The permanent fund dividend of a former recipient of a public assistance program listed under (a) of this section may be taken under AS

43.23.140(b)(6)

and

43.23.170

to satisfy the balance due on a defaulted overpayment claim.

History.

(§ 91 ch 36 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 35 SLA 1995; am § 37 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 5 ch 96 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 10 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2018, “AS

43.23.140(b)(6)

and

43.23.170

” was substituted for “AS 43.23.065(b)(6) and

43.23.068

” to reflect the renumbering of those sections.

Cross references. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 10, SLA 2016, see 2016 Senate Journal 1611 — 1612.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 1, 2016, rewrote (a).

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 2, ch. 10, SLA 2016, the changes made to subsection (a) in sec. 1, ch. 10, SLA 2016, apply to “to the recovery of benefit overpayments for public assistance programs administered by the Department of Health and Social Services under AS

47.05.010

, regardless of whether the overpayments occurred before, on, or after July 1, 2016.”

Sec. 47.05.085.
Subpoena power.

The commissioner or the commissioner’s designee at the director level may issue subpoenas to compel the production of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, and other records considered necessary as evidence in connection with an investigation under or the administration of AS 47.07 (medical assistance), AS 47.08 (assistance for catastrophic illnesses and acute or chronic medical conditions), AS 47.25 (day care assistance, child care grants, general relief, adult public assistance, and food stamps), and AS 47.27 (Alaska temporary assistance program).

In case of refusal to obey a subpoena issued to any person under (a) of this section, the superior court may, upon application by the department, issue an order requiring the person to appear before the department to produce evidence if ordered. Failure to obey the order of the court is punishable as contempt.

A person who, without just cause, fails or refuses to produce books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, and other records, if it is in the person’s power to do so, in obedience to a subpoena of the department or an authorized representative of it, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of not more than $200, or by imprisonment for not more than 60 days, or by both. Each day the failure or refusal continues is a separate offense.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 2004)

Sec. 47.05.090.
Authorization of the Interstate Compact on Adoption and Medical Assistance.

The Department of Health and Social Services may, on behalf of the state, enter into the Interstate Compact on Adoption and Medical Assistance and supplementary agreements with agencies of other states for the provision of adoption and medical assistance under AS 47.07 and other provisions of this title for eligible children with special needs.

In this section, “state” includes a state, territory, possession, or commonwealth of the United States.

History.

(§ 15 ch 99 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For privacy of client records: child protection services, see 7 AAC 54, art. 1.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the enactment of this section by
ch. 99, SLA 1998 (SCS CSHB 375(JUD)), see 1998 House Journal
2201.

Sec. 47.05.100.
Monthly reports concerning children.

By the 15th day of each month, the Department of Health and Social Services shall provide a report summarizing child protection activities carried out during the previous calendar month and the status of children committed to the department’s custody, including information on the number and type of reports of child abuse and neglect received, the outcome of investigations completed, the number of placements of children committed to the department’s custody, and the number of foster homes licensed. The report shall be made accessible to the public through the Internet.

History.

(§ 15 ch 99 SLA 1998)

Sec. 47.05.105.
Enhanced computerized eligibility verification system.

The department shall establish an enhanced computerized income, asset, and identity eligibility verification system for the purposes of verifying eligibility, eliminating duplication of public assistance payments, and deterring waste and fraud in public assistance programs administered by the department under AS

47.05.010

. Nothing in this section prohibits the department from verifying eligibility for public assistance through additional procedures or authorizes the department or a third-party vendor to use data to verify eligibility for a federal program if the use of that data is prohibited by federal law.

The department shall enter into a competitively bid contract with a third- party vendor for the purpose of developing a system under this section to prevent fraud, misrepresentation, and inadequate documentation when determining an applicant’s eligibility for public assistance before the payment of benefits and for periodically verifying eligibility between eligibility redeterminations and during eligibility redeterminations and reviews. The department may also contract with a third-party vendor to provide information to facilitate reviews of recipient eligibility and income verification.

The annual savings to the state resulting from the use of the system under this section must exceed the cost of implementing the system. A contract under this section must require the third-party vendor to report annual savings to the state realized from implementing the system. Payment to the third-party vendor may be based on a fee for each applicant and may include incentives for achieving a rate of success established by the department for identifying duplication, waste, and fraud in public assistance programs.

To avoid a conflict of interest, the department may not award a contract to provide services for the enrollment of public assistance providers or applicants under this title to a vendor that is awarded a contract under this section.

History.

(§ 39 ch 25 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 39, ch. 25, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect September 19, 2016.